Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Tennessee Business Combination Act

48-103-201. Short title — Part supplemental.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Business Combination Act.”

The requirements of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter shall be in addition to the requirements of applicable law, including chapters 11-27 of this title and to the applicable requirements contained in the charter or bylaws of a resident domestic corporation.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-35-201.

Cross-References. Merger and share exchange, title 48, ch. 21.

Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 4.

Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 3.

Tennessee Greenmail Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 5.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of the Market for Corporate Control: MITE, CTS, and Their Progeny (M. Wayne Marr, Robert W. Mouton), 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1989).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 42.

48-103-202. Public policy.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares the following to be the public policy of this state:

“Resident domestic corporations,” as defined by this part, represent and affect, through their ongoing business operations, a variety of constituencies including Tennessee shareholders, employees, customers, suppliers, and local communities and their economies whose welfare is vital to this state's interests;

In order to promote such welfare, the regulation of the internal affairs of resident domestic corporations as reflected in the laws of the state should allow for the stable long-term growth of resident domestic corporations;

Business combinations involving Tennessee's resident domestic corporations can impair local employment conditions and disrupt local commercial activity. These business combinations often prevent shareholders from realizing the full value of their holdings through forced mergers in which long-term investors can be subjected to the compulsory surrender of their shares with only limited rights to dissent. The threat of these business combinations also deprives shareholders of value by encouraging the adoption of short-term business strategies which may not be in the long-term interest of the corporation or this state;

Present Tennessee laws facilitate business combinations which left unbalanced could harm the economy of this state by weakening corporate performance and causing unemployment, plant closings, reduced charitable donations, a declining population base, reduced income to fee-supported local government services, a reduced tax base, and reduced income to other businesses;

Tennessee has a substantial and legitimate interest in regulating the internal affairs of its resident domestic corporations which have significant business contacts with this state, including regulating business combinations involving its resident domestic corporations which, individually or in the aggregate, employ a large number of citizens of the state, pay significant taxes, and have a substantial economic base in Tennessee; and

The general assembly intends this part to balance the substantial and legitimate interests of Tennessee in regulating the internal affairs of its resident domestic corporations as they impact upon the various constituencies and to promote and encourage long-term corporate growth.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-35-202.

Law Reviews.

The Conundrum of Directors' Duties in Nearly Insolvent Corporations (Mike Roberts), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (1993).

48-103-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate,” when used to indicate a relationship with an interested shareholder, means a person that directly or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, or is acting in concert with, a specified person;

“Announcement date,” when used in reference to any business combination, means the date of the first public announcement of a final definitive proposal for such business combination;

“Associate,” when used to indicate a relationship with an interested shareholder, means:

Any domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, syndicate, joint venture or other unincorporated organization of which such person is an officer, director, manager or partner (either general or limited) or is, directly or indirectly, the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of voting stock;

All members or investors in any partnership (either general or limited), syndicate or other unincorporated organization described in subdivision (3)(A);

Any trust or other estate in which such person has at least a ten percent (10%) beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; or

Any parent, child, sibling, in-law (mother, father, sons and daughters), of such person or any relative of such person who has the same residence as such person;

“Beneficial owner,” when used with respect to any class or series of shares or other securities, means a person that:

Individually, or with or through any of its affiliates or associates, beneficially owns such shares or other securities, directly or indirectly;

Individually, or with or through any of its affiliates or associates, has or shares with others:

The right to acquire or dispose of, or direct the disposition of such shares or other securities (whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time or the satisfaction of one (1) or more other conditions), pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing), or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants or options or otherwise; provided, that a person shall not be deemed the beneficial owner of any shares or other securities tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by such person or any of such person's affiliates or associates until such tendered shares or other securities are accepted for purchase or exchange; or

The right to vote or direct the voting of such shares or other securities pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing); provided, that a person shall not be deemed the beneficial owner of any shares or other securities under this subdivision (4)(B)(ii) if the agreement, arrangement or understanding to vote such shares or other securities:

Arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given in response to a proxy or consent solicitation made in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations under the Exchange Act; and

Is not then reportable on a Schedule 13D or 13G under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report); or

Has any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing), for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting (except voting pursuant to a revocable proxy or consent as described in subdivision (4)(B)) or disposing of such shares or other securities with any other person that beneficially owns, or whose affiliates or associates beneficially own, directly or indirectly, such shares;

“Business combination,” when used in reference to any resident domestic corporation and any interested shareholder of such resident domestic corporation or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder, means:

Any merger or consolidation of such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation with:

An interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder; or

Any other corporation (whether or not itself an interested shareholder of such resident domestic corporation) which is, or after such merger or consolidation would be, an affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder;

Any exchange of shares or securities convertible into shares of the resident domestic corporation with:

An interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder; or

Any other domestic or foreign corporation (whether or not itself an interested shareholder of the resident domestic corporation) which is, or after the exchange would be, an affiliate or associate of the interested shareholder;

Any sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, transfer or other disposition (in one (1) transaction or a series of transactions) to, with or proposed by or on behalf of an interested shareholder, or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder, of assets of such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation:

Having an aggregate market value equal to ten percent (10%) or more of the aggregate market value of all the assets, determined on a consolidated basis, of such resident domestic corporation;

Having an aggregate market value equal to ten percent (10%) or more of the aggregate market value of all the outstanding shares of such resident domestic corporation; or

Representing ten percent (10%) or more of the net income determined on a consolidated basis of such resident domestic corporation;

Any transaction which results in the issuance or transfer by such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation (in one (1) transaction or a series of transactions) of any shares or securities convertible into shares of such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation to such interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder except pursuant to the exercise of warrants or rights to purchase shares or securities convertible into shares, or a dividend or distribution paid or made pro rata to all shareholders of such resident domestic corporation, or in connection with the exercise or conversion of securities exercisable for or convertible into shares of such resident domestic corporation (or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation) which securities were issued and outstanding prior to the interested shareholder's share acquisition date;

The adoption of any plan or proposal for the liquidation or dissolution of such resident domestic corporation, or any reincorporation of the resident domestic corporation in another state or jurisdiction, proposed by or on behalf of, or pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) with, an interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder;

Any transaction (whether or not with or into or otherwise involving such interested shareholder), proposed by or on behalf of, or pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) with, an interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder, which has the effect, directly or indirectly, of increasing the proportionate share of the outstanding shares of any class or series of shares or securities convertible into shares entitled to vote or securities that are exchangeable for, convertible into, or carry a right to acquire shares entitled to vote, of such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned or controlled by such interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder, except as a result of immaterial changes due to fractional share adjustments; or

Any loans, advances, guarantees, pledges, financial assistance, security arrangements, restrictive covenants or any tax credits or other tax advantages provided by, through or to such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of the resident domestic corporation as a result of which an interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder receives a benefit, directly or indirectly, except proportionately as a shareholder of such resident domestic corporation;

“Consummation date,” with respect to any business combination, means the date of consummation of such business combination;

“Continuing shares” means shares held continuously of record in the name of the beneficial owner or the beneficial owner's trustee, guardian, administrator, executor, conservator or similar fiduciary on behalf of such beneficial owner, on the resident domestic corporation's stock transfer records or reported to the securities and exchange commission on a Schedule 13D or 13G or Form 3 or 4 filing pursuant to the Exchange Act for one (1) year or more prior to the date of the shareholders' meeting at which the charter or bylaw amendment is considered;

“Control,” including the terms “controlling,” “controlled by” and “under common control with,” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting stock, by contract or otherwise. A person's beneficial ownership of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of a corporation's outstanding voting stock shall create a presumption that such person has control of such corporation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a person shall not be deemed to have control of a corporation if such person holds voting power, in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this part, as an agent, bank, broker, nominee, custodian or trustee or one (1) or more beneficial owners who do not individually or as a group have control of such corporation;

“Exchange” means any share exchange whether pursuant to a plan of exchange under §§ 48-21-102, 48-21-104, and 48-21-105 or any successor or related statute, rule or law of this state or the comparable statute, rule or law of any other state or jurisdiction;

“Exchange Act” means the Act of Congress known as the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as the same has been or hereafter may be amended from time to time;

“Interested shareholder,” when used in reference to any resident domestic corporation, means any person (other than such resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation) that:

(i) Is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of any class or series of the then outstanding voting stock of such resident domestic corporation; or

Is an affiliate or associate of such resident domestic corporation and at any time within the five-year period immediately prior to the date in question was the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of any class or series of the then outstanding stock of such resident domestic corporation;

For the purpose of determining whether a person is an interested shareholder, the number of shares of voting stock of such resident domestic corporation deemed to be outstanding shall include shares deemed to be beneficially owned by such person through application of subdivision (4), but shall not include any other unissued shares of voting stock of such resident domestic corporation which may be issuable pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants or options, or otherwise;

“Market value,” when used in reference to property of any resident domestic corporation, means:

In the case of shares, the highest closing sale price during the thirty-day period immediately preceding the date in question of a share of such shares on the composite tape for New York Stock Exchange-listed stocks, or, if such shares are not quoted on such composite tape or if such shares are not listed on such exchange, on the principal United States securities exchange registered under the Exchange Act on which such shares are listed or, if such shares are not listed on any such exchange, the highest closing sale price (or bid quotation if no such sale price exists) with respect to such shares during the thirty-day period preceding the date in question on the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc., Automated Quotations System or any successor system then in use, or if no such price or quotation is available, the fair market value on the date in question of a share of such resident domestic corporation's stock as determined by the board of directors of such resident domestic corporation in good faith; or

In the case of property other than cash or shares, the fair market value of such property on the date in question as determined by the board of directors of such resident domestic corporation in good faith;

“Merger” means any merger whether pursuant to a plan of merger under §§ 48-21-102, 48-21-104, 48-21-105 and 48-21-109 or any successor or related statute, rule or law of this state or the comparable statute, rule or law of any other state or jurisdiction respecting mergers or consolidations;

“Person” means any individual, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership (general or limited), syndicate, joint venture, trust estate, unincorporated association or other entity;

“Resident domestic corporation” means an issuer of voting stock which, as of the share acquisition date in question, is organized under the laws of Tennessee and meets two (2) or more of the following requirements:

(i) The corporation has more than either ten thousand (10,000) or ten percent (10%) of its shareholders resident in Tennessee or more than ten percent (10%) of its outstanding shares held by resident Tennessee shareholders;

For purposes of this subdivision (15), the record date for determining the percentage, number and residency of the outstanding shares and shareholders shall be the last record date before the event requiring that the determination be made. Residence of each shareholder shall be presumed to be the address appearing in the records of the corporation. Shares held of record by brokers or nominees shall be disregarded if the address of the beneficial owner is known. Shares allocated to the account of an employee or former employee or beneficiaries of employees or former employees of a corporation and held in a plan that is qualified under § 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 401(a)), as amended, and is a defined contribution plan within the meaning of § 414(i) of such Code (26 U.S.C. § 414(i)), shall be deemed, for purposes of this subdivision (15), to be held of record by the employee to whose account such shares are allocated. Any shares which are not allocated under any such plan and which are held by trustees, custodians, administrators or other fiduciaries under the terms of such plan shall be deemed to be held of record by the trustee, custodian, administrator or other fiduciary with residency to be determined by home address in the case of an individual, and principal place of business in the case of a corporation;

The corporation has its principal office or place of business located in this state;

The corporation has the principal office or place of business of a significant subsidiary, representing not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the issuer's consolidated net sales, located in this state;

The corporation employs more than two hundred fifty (250) individuals in this state or has a combined annual payroll paid to residents of this state which is in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000);

The corporation produces goods and/or services in this state which result in annual gross receipts in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000); or

The corporation has physical assets and/or deposits, including those of any subsidiary, located within this state which exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in value;

“Share” or “shares” means:

Any stock or other equity interest in any class or series of stock designated in the charter of the resident domestic corporation or its subsidiaries, any certificate of interest, any participation in any profit sharing agreement, any voting trust certificate, or any certificate of deposit for stock in any class or series; and

Any security convertible, with or without consideration, into stock or other equity interest in any class or series, or any warrant, call or other option or privilege of buying stock without being bound to do so, or any other security carrying any right to acquire, subscribe to or purchase stock in any class or series;

“Share acquisition date,” with respect to any person and any resident domestic corporation, means the date that such person first becomes an interested shareholder of such resident domestic corporation;

“Subsidiary” or “subsidiaries,” with respect to any resident domestic corporation, means any other corporation which is wholly owned by the resident domestic corporation or which is organized under the laws of this state in which a majority of the shares entitled to vote are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by such resident or domestic corporation; and

“Voting stock” means all shares of the resident domestic corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-35-203; Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 61.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-204. Corporation not liable for resisting merger, exchange, etc.

No resident domestic corporation which has a class of voting stock registered or traded on a national securities exchange or registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to § 12(g) of the Exchange Act (15 U.S.C. § 78l (g)), nor any of its officers and directors shall be held liable at law or in equity for either having failed to approve the acquisition of shares by an interested shareholder on or before such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, or for seeking to enforce or implement this part and part 3 of this chapter, or for failing to adopt or recommend any charter or bylaw amendment or provision respecting this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter, or for opposing any proposed merger, exchange, tender offer or significant disposition of the assets of the resident domestic corporation or any subsidiary of such resident domestic corporation because of a good faith belief that such merger, exchange, tender offer or significant disposition of assets would adversely affect the resident domestic corporation's employees, customers, suppliers, the communities in which such resident domestic corporation or its subsidiaries operate or are located or any other relevant factor if such factors, including those factors specifically enumerated in this section, are permitted to be considered by the board of directors under the charter for such resident domestic corporation in connection with a merger, exchange, tender offer or significant disposition of assets.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-35-204.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

Law Reviews.

The Rights of Other Corporate Constituencies, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 491 (1992).

48-103-205. Business combination prohibited for five-year period — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other applicable provisions which may be contained in the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in chapters 11-27 of this title, or other Tennessee statutes to the contrary, no resident domestic corporation shall engage in any business combination, or vote, consent, or otherwise act to authorize a subsidiary of the resident domestic corporation to engage in any business combination, with, with respect to, proposed by or on behalf of, or pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) with any interested shareholder of such resident domestic corporation or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder for a period of five (5) years following such interested shareholder's share acquisition date unless:

Such business combination or the transaction which resulted in the shareholder becoming an interested shareholder is approved by the board of directors of such resident domestic corporation prior to such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, and the proposed business combination satisfies any additional applicable requirements imposed by law and by the charter or bylaws of such resident domestic corporation; or

The business combination is not subject to regulation under this part by virtue of § 48-103-207.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-35-205.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-206. Requirements for business combination.

If a business combination is subject to regulation under this part and the requisite approval for the business combination or acquisition of shares has not been obtained from the resident domestic corporation board of directors under § 48-103-205 prior to such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, a resident domestic corporation shall only engage in a business combination, or vote, consent or otherwise act to authorize a subsidiary of the resident domestic corporation to engage in any business combination, with, with respect to, proposed by or on behalf of, or pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) with, any interested shareholder of the resident domestic corporation or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder after the expiration of a period of five (5) years commencing as of such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, if such business combination satisfies all applicable requirements contained in the resident domestic corporation's charter or bylaws, the applicable provisions of the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in chapters 11-27 of this title, or other Tennessee statutes and is additionally either:

A business combination which has been approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of two thirds (2/3) of the voting stock not beneficially owned by such interested shareholder and the affiliates and associates of such interested shareholder at a meeting called for such purpose no earlier than five (5) years after such interested shareholder's share acquisition date; or

A business combination, with respect to which the consummation date is no earlier than five (5) years after the interested shareholder's share acquisition date; provided, that such business combination meets all of the following conditions:

The aggregate amount of the cash and the market value as of the consummation date of consideration other than cash to be received per share by holders of each outstanding class or series of shares of such resident domestic corporation in such business combination is at least equal to the higher of the following:

The highest per share price (including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers' fees) paid by such interested shareholder for any shares of the same class or series acquired by it:

Within the five-year period immediately prior to the announcement date with respect to such business combination; or

Within the five-year period immediately prior to the transaction in which such interested shareholder became an interested shareholder; whichever is higher; plus, in either case, interest compounded annually from the earliest date on which such highest per share acquisition price was paid through the consummation date at the rate for one-year United States treasury obligations from time to time in effect; less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid and the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash per share since such earliest date, up to the amount of such interest;

The highest preferential amount per share to which the holders of shares of such class or series of shares are entitled in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of such resident domestic corporation, plus the aggregate amount of any dividends declared or due as to which such holders are entitled prior to payment of dividends on some other class or series of shares (unless the aggregate amount of such dividends is included in such preferential amount); or

The market value per share of each class or series of shares on the announcement date with respect to such business combination or on such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, whichever is higher; plus interest compounded annually from such date through the consummation date at the rate for one-year United States treasury obligations from time to time in effect; less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid and the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash per share on each class or series of shares since such date, up to the amount of such interest;

The consideration to be received by holders of a particular class or series of outstanding shares of such resident domestic corporation in such business combination is in cash or in the same form as the interested shareholder used to acquire the largest number of shares of such class or series of shares previously acquired by the interested shareholder and such consideration shall be distributed as soon as practical;

The holders of all outstanding shares of each class or series of shares of such resident domestic corporation not beneficially owned by such interested shareholder immediately prior to the consummation of such business combination (except those who may perfect their rights of dissent) are entitled to receive in such business combination cash or other consideration for such shares in compliance with subdivisions (2)(A) and (B); and

After such interested shareholder's share acquisition date and prior to the consummation date with respect to such business combination, such interested shareholder has not become the beneficial owner of any additional shares of such resident domestic corporation except:

As part of the transaction which resulted in such interested shareholder becoming an interested shareholder;

By virtue of proportionate share splits, share dividends or other distributions of shares in respect of shares not constituting a business combination under § 48-103-203(5)(F); or

Through purchase by such interested shareholder at any price which, if such price had been paid in an otherwise permissible business combination, would have satisfied the requirements of subdivisions (2)(A)-(C).

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 5; T.C.A., § 48-35-206.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-207. Exemptions.

Business combinations which would otherwise be subject to regulation under § 48-103-205 or § 48-103-206 shall be exempt from regulation thereunder if one (1) or more of the following subdivisions are applicable:

Unless the charter of the resident domestic corporation provides otherwise, §§ 48-103-205 and 48-103-206 shall not apply to any business combination of a resident domestic corporation with, or proposed by or on behalf of, an interested shareholder or any associate or affiliate of such interested shareholder:

If the resident domestic corporation did not have, on such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, a class of voting stock registered or traded on a national securities exchange or registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to § 12(g) of the Exchange Act (15 U.S.C. § 78l (g)); or

Regardless of such registration, if the resident domestic corporation was, on such interested shareholder's share acquisition date, a holding company whose principal subsidiary was a domestic life insurance company;

Unless the charter of the resident domestic corporation provides otherwise, §§ 48-103-205 and 48-103-206 shall not apply to any business combination of a resident domestic corporation with, or proposed by or on behalf of, an interested shareholder who was an interested shareholder prior to March 11, 1988, unless subsequent thereto such interested shareholder increased such interested shareholder's proportion of the voting power of the resident domestic corporation's outstanding voting stock to a proportion in excess of the proportion of voting power such interested shareholder held prior to March 11, 1988, without prior board approval;

Sections 48-103-205 and 48-103-206 shall not apply to any business combination of a resident domestic corporation, the original charter or original bylaws of which contain a provision, or whose board of directors or shareholders adopt an amendment to the resident domestic corporation's bylaws within ninety (90) days of March 11, 1988, or, if no class or series of its voting stock is registered or traded on a national securities exchange or registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to § 12(g) of the Exchange Act within ninety (90) days of March 11, 1988, prior to the issuance of any voting stock registered or traded on a national securities exchange or registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to § 12(g) of the Exchange Act, expressly electing not to be governed by §§ 48-103-205 and 48-103-206;

Sections 48-103-205 and 48-103-206 shall not apply to any business combination of a resident domestic corporation with, or proposed by or on behalf of, an interested shareholder of such corporation who became an interested shareholder inadvertently, if such interested shareholder:

As soon as practicable divests itself of a sufficient amount of the voting stock of such resident domestic corporation so that it no longer is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of the outstanding voting stock of such corporation; and

Would not at any time within the five-year period preceding the announcement date with respect to such business combination have been an interested shareholder but for such inadvertent acquisition;

Sections 48-103-205 and 48-103-206 shall not apply to a resident domestic corporation otherwise subject to this part if an amendment to the charter or bylaws of the resident domestic corporation is approved by a majority of the continuing shares, which amendment expressly provides that such resident domestic corporation shall not be subject to §§ 48-103-205 and 48-103-206, and such amendment further expressly provides that it is not to be effective until two (2) years after the vote of the continuing shares.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 6; T.C.A., § 48-35-207.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-208. Actions for damages, injunctions, or other relief.

Actions for damages or other relief, including an injunction, against any proposed business combination which is or would be in violation of this part, may be brought by one (1) or more of the following parties:

The resident domestic corporation or any of its subsidiaries which are a party to such business combination;

Any one (1) or more of the shareholders of the voting stock of such resident domestic corporation or any of its subsidiaries which are a party to such business combination who, individually or in the aggregate with other shareholders joining in such action, hold five percent (5%) or more of any class or series of the issued and outstanding voting stock of such resident domestic corporation (or any of its subsidiaries if a party to such business combination) which are not beneficially owned by the interested shareholder and the affiliates and associates of such interested shareholder as of the time the action is instituted; or

By the attorney general and reporter.

No action alleging a violation of this part may be instituted more than one (1) year after the consummation date for the business combination which is allegedly in violation of this part.

No bond or other security shall be required as a condition for the issuance of any restraining order or other injunctive relief ordered by any court of competent jurisdiction in connection with any action brought to enforce this part.

Actions may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction for violations of this part in the same manner as any other civil action.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 7; T.C.A., § 48-35-208.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-209. Severability — Construction with other laws.

If any clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstances shall be held invalid, such holding shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of this part or the application of such portion held invalid to any other person or circumstances, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion thereof directly involved in such holding or to the person or circumstances therein involved.

If any provision of this part is inconsistent with, in conflict with, or contrary to any other provision of Tennessee law, such provision of this part shall prevail over such other provision and such other provision shall be deemed to be amended, superseded or repealed to the extent of such inconsistency or conflict.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 8; T.C.A., § 48-35-209.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.